Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 35 Hearing Aid Specialist Licensure

Cross references. —

As to licensing generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of state statutes regulating hearing aid fitting or sales, 96 ALR3d 1020.

§ 33-35-101.
Short title.

This act shall be known as the “Hearing Aid Specialist Licensure Act”.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-424.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the board of hearing aid specialists;

“Hearing aid” means any instrument or device designed to be worn on the person for the purpose of aiding or compensating for impaired human hearing and any parts, attachments or accessories, including an earmold, but excluding batteries and cords;

“Hearing aid specialist” or “hearing aid dealer” means a person who specializes in either the fitting, dealing or dispensing of hearing aids; the hearing aid dealer is synonymous to a hearing aid specialist;

“Permittee” means a person who is in training or awaiting examination to become a licensed hearing aid specialist;

“Practice of either dispensing or fitting hearing aids” means the commercial or noncommercial selection, adaptation and sale of hearing aids, and includes the testing of hearing for these purposes. The testing of hearing shall include the test whether or not a hearing aid shall be recommended as needed. The practice also includes the making of impressions for earmolds and counseling and instruction pertaining to the selection, fitting, adaptation or sale of hearing aids;

“Sell” or “sale” means any transfer of title or of the right to use by lease, bailment or any other means, excluding wholesale transactions with distributors or dealers;

“Temporary permit” means a permit issued while the applicant is in training or awaiting examination to become a licensed hearing aid specialist;

“This act” means W.S.

33-35-101

through

33-35-121

.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-425.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-35-103.
License required to sell, dispense or fit hearing aids.

After July 1, 1977 anyone involved in either the direct or indirect sale or distribution of hearing aids shall be licensed under this act. The license shall be conspicuously posted in the licensee’s office or place of business. Duplicate licenses shall be issued by the board to valid license holders operating more than one (1) office, without additional payment. A license under this act confers upon the holder the right to select, fit or sell hearing aids.

Nothing in this act prohibits a corporation, partnership, trust, association or like organization maintaining an established business address from engaging in the business of fitting, dispensing, selling or offering for sale hearing aids at retail without a license, if it employs only properly licensed persons in the direct sale or fitting of such products. Such corporations, partnerships, trusts, associations or like organizations shall file annually with the board a list of all licensed hearing aid specialists directly or indirectly employed by it.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-426.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first and last sentences in subsection (a), and the first sentence in subsection (b), see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-104.
Receipt required to be furnished to person supplied with hearing aid.

Any person who fits, dispenses or sells hearing aids shall deliver to each person supplied with a hearing aid a receipt containing the licensee’s signature, his business address and the number of his certificate, together with specifications as to the make, model and serial number of the hearing aid furnished and full terms of sale clearly stated. If a hearing aid which is not new is sold, the receipt and the container shall be clearly marked “used” or “reconditioned”, whichever is applicable, and the receipt shall state any terms of guarantee.

This receipt shall bear in no smaller type than the largest used in the body copy portion the following: “The purchaser has been advised that any examination or representations made by a licensed hearing aid specialist in connection with either the fitting or selling of this hearing aid is not an examination, diagnosis or prescription by a person licensed to practice medicine in this state and shall not be regarded as medical opinion.”

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-427.

§ 33-35-105.
Criteria for medical referral.

Wherever any of the following conditions are found to exist either from observations by the licensee or permittee [or] on the basis of information furnished by the prospective hearing aid user, a licensee or permittee shall, prior to either fitting, dispensing or selling a hearing aid, recommend in writing that the prospective user’s best interest would be served if he would consult a licensed physician specializing in diseases of the ear or, if no such specialist is available in the community, any licensed physician:

Visible congenital or traumatic deformity of the ear;

History of or active drainage from the ear within the previous ninety (90) days;

History of sudden or rapidly progressive hearing loss within the previous ninety (90) days;

Acute or chronic dizziness;

Unilateral hearing loss of sudden or recent onset within the previous ninety (90) days;

Significant air-bone gap when generally acceptable standards have been established;

Visible evidence of cerumen accumulation or a foreign body in the ear canal.

A person receiving the written recommendation who elects to purchase a hearing aid without the recommended consultation shall sign a written acknowledgment of the recommendation which shall be kept by the licensee for at least seven (7) years. Nothing in this section required to be performed by a licensee shall be construed to mean that the licensee is engaged in the diagnosis of illness or the practice of medicine.

Any person engaging in the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids shall, when dealing with a child sixteen (16) years of age or under, ascertain whether the child has been examined by an otolaryngologist or licensed clinical audiologist within three (3) months prior to the fitting. If such is not the case it shall be unlawful to sell a hearing aid to a child.

The provisions of subsection (c) of this section shall not be applicable for any child whose parent or guardian submits written objection to such procedure.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S 1957, § 33-428.

§ 33-35-106.
Persons and practices not affected.

This act does not apply to a person who is a physician or a clinical audiologist licensed to practice in Wyoming as long as he is not involved in the direct or indirect sale or distribution of hearing aids.

This act is not intended to prevent any person from engaging in the practice of measuring human hearing and the selection of hearing aids if the person or the organization employing this person does not either dispense or sell hearing aids or accessories thereto, except in the case of earmolds.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-429.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections (a) and (b), see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-107.
License by experience.

For a period of six (6) months following the effective date of this act, applicants for license shall be issued a license provided that applicant is an adult as defined in W.S.

14-1-101

and has been principally engaged in distributing or fitting hearing aids in Wyoming for at least two (2) years within the three (3) years immediately prior to the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-430.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 3, makes the act effective May 27, 1977.

Meaning of “the act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-108.
Issuance of license and certificate of endorsement.

The board shall issue a license, signed by the board, to each applicant without discrimination who satisfactorily passes the experience requirements provided in W.S.

33-35-107

or passes an examination as provided in W.S.

33-35-109

and upon receipt of payment for the license. The license is effective until January 30 of the year following the year in which issued.

The board may issue certificates of endorsement to applicants who hold current, valid certificates or licenses to fit, dispense or sell hearing aids issued by another state whenever the board determines that the other state has requirements and programs for determining whether applicants are qualified to dispense or fit hearing aids that are equivalent or more stringent than those in effect in Wyoming. No applicant for a certificate of endorsement shall be required to undergo a qualifying examination pursuant to W.S.

33-35-108

and

33-35-113

. The holder of a certificate of endorsement shall be registered in the same manner as licensees. The fee for an initial certificate of endorsement shall be the same as the fee for an initial license. Fees, grounds for renewal and procedures for the suspension and revocation of certificates of endorsement shall be the same as for renewal, suspension and revocation of a license.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-431.

§ 33-35-109.
License by examination.

Applicants who do not meet the experience qualification on the effective date of this act may obtain a license by successfully passing a qualifying examination, provided the applicant:

Is an adult as defined in W.S.

14-1-101

;

Has an education equivalent to a four (4) year course in an accredited high school.

Applicants for license by examination shall appear at a time, place and before persons that the board designates, to be examined by written and practical tests in order to demonstrate their qualification to practice the dispensing, fitting or sale of hearing aids. The examination shall not require college training, and nothing in the examination shall imply that the applicant possesses the degree of medical competence normally expected of physicians.

Examinations shall be offered by the board at least twice a year.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-432.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 3, makes the act effective May 27, 1977.

Meaning of “the act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-110.
Temporary permit.

An applicant who fulfills the requirements set forth in W.S. 33-35-109(a), may obtain a temporary permit upon application to the board. Previous experience or a waiting period is not required to obtain a temporary permit.

Upon receiving an application accompanied by a fee set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, the board shall issue a temporary permit entitling the applicant to engage in either the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids for a period of one (1) year. A person holding a valid hearing aid specialist license is responsible for the supervision and training of an applicant operating under a temporary permit.

The board shall issue a temporary permit for use without supervision by a licensee, to an applicant entering into a hearing aid dealership as sole owner, principal of a firm or as an employee-manager of a corporation if he fulfills the requirements of W.S. 33-35-109(a), and has been principally engaged in the practice of fitting, dispensing or dealing in hearing aids for at least two (2) years within the three (3) years immediately prior to the application.

If a person who holds a temporary permit under subsection (b) of this section has not successfully passed the licensing examination within one (1) year from the date of issuance, the temporary permit may be renewed once upon payment of a fee as set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. This renewal shall not be granted to holders of temporary permits under subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-433; 1993, ch. 131, § 1.

§ 33-35-111.
Scope of examination.

The qualifying examination provided in W.S.

33-35-108

shall be designed to demonstrate the applicant’s technical qualifications by:

Tests of knowledge in the following areas as they pertain to the fitting and sale of hearing aids:

Basic physics of sound;

The anatomy and physiology of the ear;

The function of hearing aids;

Knowledge and understanding of the grounds for revocation, suspension or probation of a license;

Knowledge and understanding of criminal offenses associated with violations of this act.

Practical tests of proficiency in the following techniques as they pertain to the fitting of hearing aids:

The procedures and use of equipment designed for the fitting of hearing aids;

Taking earmold impressions;

Measurement of hearing as it pertains to the fitting of hearing aids;

Recording and evaluation of audiograms and speech audiometry to determine proper selection and adaptation of a hearing aid.

Evidence of knowledge regarding the medical and rehabilitation facilities for individuals with impaired hearing that are available in the area served.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-434.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (a)(i)(E), see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-112.
Notice of place of business; service of notice.

Every licensee shall notify the board in writing of his principal place of business in which he intends to engage in the fitting, dispensing or selling of hearing aids.

The board shall keep a record of the place of business of licensees.

Any notice required to be given by the board to a person who holds a license shall be mailed to him by certified mail at the address of the last known place of business.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-435.

§ 33-35-113.
Annual renewal of license; fees; effect of failure to renew.

Each person who engages in the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids shall annually, on or before January 30, pay to the board a fee as set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

for renewal of his license and shall keep the certificate conspicuously posted in his office or place of business at all times. Where more than one (1) office is operated by the licensee, duplicate certificates shall be issued by the board for posting in each location. A thirty (30) day grace period shall be allowed after January 30, during which time licenses may be renewed on payment of an additional fee as set by the board pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

. After expiration of the grace period, the board may renew a certificate upon payment of an additional fee as set by the board pursuant to W.S. 33-1-201. No person who applies for renewal, whose license has expired, shall be required to submit to any examination as a condition to renewal, if the renewal application is made within two (2) years from the date of expiration. Receipt of a certificate of calibration of audiometer must accompany renewal of license.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-436; 1993, ch. 131, § 1.

§ 33-35-114.
Continuing education.

On and after January 1, 1978, each hearing aid specialist applying for a renewal of his license shall furnish to the board evidence that during the preceding year he has completed one (1) of the following continuing education programs:

Educational programs conducted by the board;

Board approved training schools conducted by hearing aid manufacturers for their representatives;

Board approved training sessions conducted by the National Hearing Aid Society; or

Other educational means approved by the board.

The amount of continued education shall be determined by the rules and regulations of the board. The board shall send a written notice to this effect to every person holding a valid license at least thirty (30) days prior to the license renewal date each year, directed to the last known address of the licensee.

In the event that any licensee shall fail to meet the annual educational requirement, his license shall not be renewed by the board, but the board may renew the license upon the presentation of satisfactory evidence of educational study of a standard approved by the board and upon the payment of all fees due.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-437.

§ 33-35-115.
Complaints; grounds for revocation or suspension of license.

A person may make a complaint against a licensee under this act by filing a complaint in writing with the board within one (1) year from the date of the action upon which the complaint is based. If the board determines the charges made are sufficient to warrant a hearing, it shall make an order fixing a time and place for a hearing and require the licensee complained against to appear and show cause why his license should not be suspended or revoked. The order shall include a copy of the complaint and shall be served upon the licensee at least twenty (20) days before the date set for hearing, either personally or by registered mail sent to licensee’s last known address. Hearings shall be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Any person registered under this act may have his license revoked or suspended for a period fixed by the board for any of the following causes:

Conviction of a felony or a misdemeanor that relates to the practice of fitting, dealing or dispensing hearing aids or to the ability to fit, deal or dispense hearing aids;

Procuring a license by fraud or deceit practiced upon the board;

Unethical conduct, including:

The obtaining of any fee or the making of any sale by fraud or misrepresentation;

Knowingly employing directly or indirectly any suspended or unregistered person to perform any work covered by this act;

Using, causing or promoting the use of any advertising matter, promotional literature, testimonial, guarantee, warranty, label, brand, insignia or any other representation, however disseminated or published, which is misleading, deceptive or untruthful;

Advertising a particular model or type of hearing aid for sale when purchasers or prospective purchasers responding to the advertisement cannot purchase the advertised model or type, where it is established the purpose of the advertisement is to obtain prospects for the sale of a different model or type than that advertised;

Representing that the service or advice of a person licensed to practice medicine shall be used or made available in the selection, fitting, adjustment, maintenance or repair of hearing aids when that is not true, or using the words “doctor”, “clinic”, “clinical audiologist”, “state licensed clinic”, “state registered”, “state certified”, “state approved” or similar term, abbreviations, symbol or wearing any costume when it would falsely give the impression that one is being treated medically, or professionally or that the licensee’s service has been recommended by the state;

Permitting another’s use of a license;

Advertising a manufacturer’s product or using a manufacturer’s name or trademark which implies a relationship with the manufacturer that does not exist;

Directly or indirectly giving or offering to give, or permitting or causing to be given money or anything of value to any person who advises another in a professional capacity as an inducement to influence him or have him influence others to purchase or contract to purchase products sold or offered for sale by a hearing aid specialist, or influencing persons to refrain from dealing in the products of competitors.

Engaging in either the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids under a false name or alias with fraudulent intent;

Selling a hearing aid to a person who has not been given tests utilizing appropriate established procedures and instrumentation in fitting of hearing aids, except in cases of selling replacement hearing aids within one (1) year;

Gross incompetence or negligence in fitting, dispensing or selling hearing aids;

Failure to supervise a trainee as required by W.S. 33-35-110(b) or to accept responsibility for the actions of a trainee relating to the fitting and selling of hearing aids; and

Violating any provision of this act.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-438; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(i), substituted “that relates to the practice of fitting, dealing or dispensing hearing aids or the ability to fit, deal or dispense hearing aids” for “involving moral turpitude” following “misdemeanor.”

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi) and notes thereto.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout this section, see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-116.
Prohibited acts and practices.

No person shall:

Sell, barter or offer to sell or barter a license;

Purchase or procure by barter a license with intent to use it as evidence of the holder’s qualification to practice either the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids;

Alter a license with fraudulent intent;

Use or attempt to use a license which has been purchased, fraudulently obtained, counterfeited or materially altered;

Willfully make a false statement in an application for license or application for renewal of a license; or

Sell a hearing aid to a person under the age of sixteen (16) or to any person in a mental institution, hospital, nursing home, convalescent home or like institution, unless there is present in addition to the licensee an adult person who is not a business associate of the licensee.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-439.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 33-35-117.
Board of hearing aid specialists.

There is established a board of hearing aid specialists.

Members of the board shall be residents of the state. The board shall consist of five (5) members. Three (3) members shall be hearing aid specialists, one (1) member shall be a certified otolaryngologist and one (1) member shall be a clinical audiologist, licensed in Wyoming. Each hearing aid specialist on the board shall have not less than five (5) years of experience and shall hold a valid license as a hearing aid specialist as provided under this act. The hearing aid specialists first appointed shall have no less than five (5) years of experience and shall fulfill all qualifications for license by experience as provided under this act.

All members of this board shall be appointed by the governor. The term of office of each member is four (4) years, except that of the members first appointed, two (2) shall be appointed for two (2) years; two (2) shall be appointed for three (3) years; and one (1) shall be appointed for four (4) years. All terms expire on June 30, and the governor shall appoint a successor to assume his duties on July 1, at the expiration of his predecessor’s term. A vacancy in the office of a member shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. The members of the board shall annually designate one (1) member to serve as chairman and another to serve as secretary-treasurer. No member of the board who has served two (2) or more full terms may be reappointed to the board until at least one (1) year after the expiration of his most recent full term of office. The governor may remove any board member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

Board members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii), incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-440; Laws 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (d), substituted “shall receive per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “shall be paid for actual expenses.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the last two sentences in subsection (b), see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-118.
Powers and duties of board.

The powers and duties of the board are as follows:

Authorize all disbursements necessary to carry out the provisions of this act;

Supervise issuance of licenses and administer qualifying examinations to test the knowledge and proficiency of applicants licensed by examination;

Determine by test if individuals are qualified to engage in the fitting, dispensing or sale of hearing aids;

Issue and renew licenses;

Suspend or revoke licenses in the manner provided by law;

Designate the time and place for examining applicants;

Appoint representatives to conduct or supervise the examination;

Make and publish rules and regulations not inconsistent with the laws of this state which are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act;

Appoint or employ subordinate employees.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-441.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a)(i) and (a)(viii), see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

§ 33-35-119.
Meetings of board.

The board shall meet during July of each calendar year to select a chairman and for other business. At least one (1) additional meeting shall be held before the end of each calendar year. Further meetings may be convened at the call of the chairman or on the written request of any three (3) board members.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-442.

§ 33-35-120.
Disposition of receipts.

The board shall report to the state treasurer by the fifth day of each month the amount and source of all revenue received by it during the preceding month, and shall pay the entire amount thereof into a separate account. The treasurer is hereby directed to establish such an account.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-443; Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “a separate account.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act”.

§ 33-35-121.
Penalties.

Violation of any provisions of this act are punishable, upon conviction, by a fine of not more than four hundred dollars ($400.00) or imprisonment for not more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-444.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-35-102(a)(viii).

Severability. —

Laws 1977, ch. 163, § 2, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”